Illinois, session 104th, HB5747.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 202 and by adding Section 253 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/202)  (from Ch. 120, par. 2-202)7    Sec. 202. Net Income Defined. 8    (a) In general. For purposes of this Act, a taxpayer's net 9income for a taxable year shall be that portion of his base 10income for such year which is allocable to this State under the 11provisions of Article 3, less the standard exemption allowed 12by Section 204 and the deduction allowed by Section 207.13    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a 14taxpayer has been granted a waiver under Section 253, that 15taxpayer's net income shall be zero for each taxable year in 16which the waiver is in effect. 17(Source: P.A. 92-846, eff. 8-23-02.) 18    (35 ILCS 5/253 new)19    Sec. 253. Parent income tax waiver. 20    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a taxpayer 21who (i) is a resident of Illinois, (ii) is legally domiciled in 22the United States, and (iii) on or after July 1, 2027, becomes   HB5747- 2 -LRB104 21056 HLH 36250 b1a parent, either through birth or adoption, may apply to the 2Department for a waiver of the taxpayer's State income taxes 3for the taxable year in which the child is born or the adoption 4of the child is finalized, as applicable, and for the next 2 5succeeding taxable years. In the case of spouses filing a 6joint return, the waiver shall be granted to both spouses. The 7taxpayer remains eligible for the waiver under this Section 8for each of the 3 taxable years for which it is granted, 9provided that (i) the taxpayer remains a resident of Illinois 10for the entirety of any taxable year for which the taxpayer 11claims a waiver under this Section, (ii) the taxpayer is 12legally domiciled in the United States for the entirety of any 13taxable year for which the taxpayer claims a waiver under this 14Section, and (iii) the child with respect to whom the waiver 15was granted is a qualifying child of the taxpayer, as defined 16in subsection (c) of Section 152 of the Internal Revenue Code, 17for the taxable year for which the waiver is claimed.18    (b) If the Department determines that a taxpayer has 19received a waiver under this Section and the taxpayer was not 20entitled to the waiver, the Department shall assess penalties 21against the taxpayer and revoke the taxpayer's waiver in 22accordance with rules adopted by the Department. 23    (c) The Department, in cooperation with the Commission on 24Government Forecasting and Accountability, shall conduct an 25annual review of the impact of the program under this Section, 26including metrics on family retention rates, birth and   HB5747- 3 -LRB104 21056 HLH 36250 b1adoption trends, and fiscal effects. Reports shall be 2submitted to the Governor and the General Assembly by December 331, 2027 and by December 31 of each calendar year thereafter. 4    (d) The Department shall adopt rules for the 5implementation of this Section. 6    (e) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 7250.